Arkansas, session 2025, HB1554.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 9, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 16 - Assisted Reproductive Technology Reporting Act

20-9-1601. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Assisted
Reproductive Technology Reporting Act".

20-9-1602. Legislative findings.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) The federal Fertility Clinic Success Rate and Certification
Act of 1992 requires the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention to track
certain health outcomes and success rates of assisted reproductive
technology;
(2) However, this law lacks a strong enforcement mechanism and
is too limited in scope;
(3) Additionally, the law governing assisted reproductive
technology in Arkansas does not require fertility clinics to report key data
*JMB056*
02-26-2025 10:13:58 JMB056

As Engrossed: H2/26/25 HB1554
points related to assisted reproductive technology, maternal and neonatal
health, and the total number of embryos created through this procedure; and
(4) Therefore, many prospective parents, lawmakers, researchers,
and fertility clinics lack an adequate understanding of how assisted
reproductive technology functions in the State of Arkansas and information
that is essential for prospective parents as they make important decisions
about their childbearing options.

20-9-1603. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Assisted reproductive technology" means a treatment or
procedure involving the handling of a human egg, sperm, and embryo outside of
the body with the intent of facilitating a pregnancy, including:
(A) Artificial insemination;
(B) Intrauterine insemination;
(C) In vitro fertilization;
(D) Gamete intrafallopian fertilization;
(E) Zygote intrafallopian fertilization;
(F) Egg, embryo, and sperm cryopreservation; and
(G) Egg, sperm, or embryo donation;
(2)(A) "Cycle" means a single procedure of in vitro
fertilization, zygote intrafallopian transfer, gamete intrafallopian
transfer, or egg retrieval.
(B) A "cycle" that is completed may only refer to egg
retrieval if no eggs are fertilized and implanted into the patient or may
mean the complete process from egg retrieval to the transfer of human
reproductive material;
(3) "Egg donor" means a person unrelated by marriage to the
recipient who provides or agrees to provide ovum for the purpose of human
reproduction, regardless of if the recipient has a diagnosis of infertility;
(4) "Embryo cryopreservation" means the process when human
embryos are frozen in an undisturbed environment for the purpose of saving
these embryos for future procreative use;
(5) "Fertility clinic" means a medical facility that is
licensed, registered, or certified under federal laws or regulations or state
laws and rules and that is responsible for the collection and preservation of
02-26-2025 10:13:58 JMB056

As Engrossed: H2/26/25 HB1554
human reproductive material responsible for the creation of human embryos or
the placement of human reproductive material into a prospective patient;
(6) "Healthcare professional" means an individual licensed,
registered, or certified under federal laws or regulations or state laws and
rules to provide healthcare services;
(7) "Human embryo" means a distinct and living organism of the
species Homo sapiens conceived either in the human body or produced in an
artificial environment other than the human body, from the moment of
fertilization, including the single-celled stage, until natural death,
including such embryos that are in a state of cryopreservation or are
otherwise unused;
(8) "Human embryo implantation" means a human embryo has
successfully attached to a patient’s uterine wall lining which marks the
beginning of pregnancy;
(9) "Human reproductive material" means all or any part of a
sperm, ovum, or embryo at any stage of development;
(10) "Infertility" means a symptom of an underlying disease or
condition within a person’s body that makes successfully conceiving and
carrying a child to term difficult or impossible, which is diagnosed after:
(A) Twelve (12) months of intercourse without the use of a
chemical, barrier, or other contraceptive method for women under thirty-five
(35) years of age; or
(B) Six (6) months of targeted intercourse without the use
of a chemical, barrier, or other contraceptive method for women who are
thirty-five (35) years of age and older, where conception should otherwise be
possible;
(11) "Prospective patient" means the patient who may undergo
assisted reproductive technology treatments, including the transfer of human
embryos for the purpose of initiating pregnancy;
(12) "Transfer" means the process by which a healthcare
professional places a fresh or frozen embryo within the uterus, fallopian
tubes, or other part of a patient’s body for the purpose of initiating a
pregnancy; and
(13) "Sperm donor" means a person unrelated by marriage to a
prospective patient who provides or agrees to provide sperm for the purpose
of human reproduction, regardless of whether the prospective patient has a
02-26-2025 10:13:58 JMB056

As Engrossed: H2/26/25 HB1554
diagnosis of infertility.

20-9-1604. Reporting requirements.
(a) The Department of Health shall require fertility clinics to track
and report key data points, including without limitation:
(1) How many embryos each fertility clinic creates in total
through assisted reproductive technology cycles;
(2) What happens to each of the embryos created and the number
of embryos that:
(A) Are negligently destroyed each year due to the failure
of a cryopreservation tank or technical or human error;
(B) Perish due to natural causes during fertilization,
development, or implantation in assisted reproductive technology;
(C) Perish due to preimplantation genetic testing in
assisted reproductive technology;
(D)(i) Are intentionally destroyed at the discretion of
the fertility clinic or the prospective patient.
(ii) The fertility clinic shall specify why the
fertility clinic or prospective patient chose to discard or destroy the
embryo;
(E) Are relinquished by prospective patients to a clinic;
(F) Are donated by prospective patients for research
purposes; and
(G) Are created in each cycle of assisted reproductive
technology;
(3) If, and how often, the fertility clinic loses the human
reproductive material of prospective patients due to unknown or undisclosed
reasons;
(4) Any instances of a healthcare professional knowingly
transferring non-viable human reproductive material into a patient, with or
without the patient’s knowledge;
(5) The total number of embryos that are frozen in
cryopreservation storage units and the number of embryos frozen prior to
submitting the report each year, whenever that occurs, under the supervision
of the reporting fertility clinic;
(6) How many embryos are transferred fresh versus frozen;
02-26-2025 10:13:58 JMB056

As Engrossed: H2/26/25 HB1554
(7) How many embryos are transferred in a single transfer cycle;
(8) How many embryos successfully implant when conceived with
assisted reproductive technology but are miscarried, perish naturally in the
womb, or are stillborn;
(9) How many pregnancies result from assisted reproductive
technology procedures;
(10) How many live births result from assisted reproductive
technology procedures; and
(11) How many cases of multiple gestation occur from assisted
reproductive technology procedures.
(b) The information reported under this section shall not include any
personally identifiable information and shall only include statistical
aggregate information.

20-9-1605. Annual public report.
(a) Within twelve (12) months of receiving the annual assisted
reproductive technology data from fertility clinics, the Department of Health
shall compile and publish a comprehensive report, available for public use,
cataloging key data points for research, accountability, and prospective
patient use, including without limitation:
(1) How many fertility clinics are registered to practice
assisted reproductive technology;
(2) How many assisted reproductive technology and egg retrieval
cycles each fertility clinic performs;
(3) A percentage breakdown of the types of assisted reproductive
technology procedures each fertility clinic performs;
(4) The success rate of each form of assisted reproductive
technology, broken down by age of the patient, whether donor ovum or sperm
was used, and the total number of cycles required for the successful live
birth of a child per patient; and
(5) Compile and report the outcomes of each of the individual
fertility clinic data collection points described under § 20-9-1604.
(b) The comprehensive report described under subsection (a) of this
section shall not include any personally identifiable information and shall
only include statistical aggregate information.

02-26-2025 10:13:58 JMB056

As Engrossed: H2/26/25 HB1554
/s/A. Brown



































02-26-2025 10:13:58 JMB056